Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5370XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 2031 Section 1. Section 20.22, subsection 10, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 (a) Three Five percent. 4 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 5 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 6 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to collective 7 bargaining procedures pursuant to chapter 20 initiated on or 8 after the effective date of this Act. 9